District of Columbia statutes.
1-614.14

Development of plans and reports.

(a)

Agencies of the District of Columbia shall develop the performance plans and performance reports that are submitted by January 1, 1996, January 1, 1997, and succeeding years in consultation with the Office of the District of Columbia Auditor.

(b)

The Mayor shall order that the District of Columbia Office of Personnel amend its management and personnel laws and regulations to be in conformance with the provisions of this subchapter.

(c)

The Office of the District of Columbia Auditor shall conduct an audit of selected performance measures presented in performance reports of certain agencies each fiscal year.

(d)

The District may invite outside review of the process and the indicators upon the submission of the first performance plan and performance report to obtain recommendations concerning the process and the indicators, and after the initial review, on a biannual basis.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1414
as added May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 11-16, § 2(b), 42 DCR 1394
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2402(b), 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2402(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2402(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
“The Office of the District of Columbia Auditor shall conduct an audit of the performance reports of the District of Columbia that are submitted in 1997 and 1998.”
D.C. Law 13-172 rewrote subsec. (c), which previously read:
1981 Ed., § 1-615.14.
Organization for personnel management, rules and regulations, see § 1-604.04.
Mayor and Council members, coverage, see § 1-602.02.